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DI3P1-02

DTC P0 130/21| Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC PO 150/28/0xygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction
(Bank2 Sensor 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Toobtain a high purification rate forthe CO, HC and NOx components ofthe exhaust gas, athree -way
catalytic converteris used, but forthe most efficient use of the three —-way catalyticconverter,theair —fuel
ratio must be precisely controlled sothatitis always closeto the stoichiometric air —fuelratio.

The oxygen sensor has the characteristic whereby its output voltage changes suddenly in the vicinity of the
stoichiometric air —fuelratio. This characteristicis usedto detectthe oxygen concentrationinthe exhaust

gas and provide feedbackto the computerfor control ofthe air —fuelratio.

Whentheair —fuelratiobecomesLEAN, the oxygen concentrationinthe exhaustincreases andthe oxygen
sensor informs the engine ECU of the LEAN condition (small electromotive force: 0 V).

Whentheair —fuelratiois RICHER thanthe stoichiometric air —fuelratiothe oxygen concentrationinthe ex-
haust gas is reduced and the oxygen sensor informs the engine ECU of the RICH condition (large electromo-
tiveforce: 1 V). Theengine ECU judges by the electromotive force fromthe oxygen sensorwhetherthe air

fuel ratio is RICH or LEAN and controls the injection time accordingly. However, if malfunction of the oxygen
sensor causes output of abnormal electromotive force, the engine ECU is unable to perform accurate air -
fuel ratio control.

The oxygen sensors include a heater which heats the Zirconia element. The heater is controlled by the en-
gine ECU. When the intake air volume is low (the temperature of the exhaust gas is low) current flows to the
heater to heat the sensor for accurate oxygen concentration detection.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

After the engine is warmed up, oxygen sensor signal voltage is
P0130/21 redL:;-:fd to betwedenbO..SS V and 0.70 V for 60 sec. with under « Oxygen sensor
P0150/28 con ||9ns(a)an (b):

(a) Engine speed: 4,000 rpm or less

(b) Vehiclespeed: 100km/h (62 mph) orless

* Fueltrim malfunction

HINT:

Bank 1 refers to bank that includes cylinder No.1.

Bank 2 refers to bank that does not include cylinder No.1.

Sensor 1 refers to the sensor closer to the engine body.

The oxygen sensor’s output voltage and the short - termfueltrimvalue can beread usingthe
hand- heldtester.
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

Vehicle speed

50 ~ 65 km/h (4)
(31~40mphy | T

Idling ~+---
G sw oFF (el

1 ~ 3 min. J‘ 1 min. Time

FI7130

(1) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

)
(2) Switch the hand-held tester from normal mode to check (test) mode (See page DI-4).
(8) Start the engine and warm it up with all accessory switches OFF.
(4) Drivethevehicleat50 ~65km/h(3 1 ~40mph)for 1~ 3min.towarmupthe oxygensensor.
(5) Lettheengineidlefor 1 min.
(6) Perfom steps (3) to (5) three times.
HINT:

If a malfunction exists, the CHK ENG will be indicated on the multiinformation display during step (6).
NOTICE:

If the conditions in this test are not strictly followed, detection of the malfunction will not be possible.
Ifyoudonothaveahand -heldtester,turntheignition switch OFF after performing steps (3) to (6),
then perform steps (3) to (6) again.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Whenusing hand -heldtester

HINT:

Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air -

fuslratigleanorrich-etcatthetimeofthemalfunction.

1 Checkforopenand shortin harness and connector between engine ECU and
oxygen sensor (See page IN-19).
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Check for oxygen sensor data.

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS3.
Warm up the engine to normal operating temperature.
CHECK:
Read the oxygen sensor output voltage and short-term fuel trim.
RESULT:

Pattern

Oxygen sensor output voltage

Short-term fuel trim

1

Lean condition (Changes at 0.55 V or less)

Changes at about +20 %

2

Rich condition (Changes at 0.35 V or more)

Changesatabout -20%

3

Except 1 and2

=

D

Check fuel trim system (See page DI-61).

3

Check output voltage of oxygen sensor during idling.

PREPARATION:

Warm up the oxygen sensor with the engine at 2,500 rpm for approx. 90 sec.
CHECK:
Usethehand -heldtesterreadthe outputvoltage ofthe oxygen sensorduringidling.

OK:

Oxygen sensor output voltage:
Alternates repeatedly between less than 0.35 V and more than 0.70 V (See the following table).

OK

NG

NG

NG

1V

0.70V ----

035V ----

oV

A00292
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OX Signal Waveform
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Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

With the engine racing (4,000 rpm) measure waveform be-

tween terminals OXL1, OXR1 and E1 of the engine ECU .

HINT:

S The correct waveform is as shown oscillating between
approx. 0.1V and 0.9 V.

S If the oxygen sensor has deteriorated, the amplitude of
the voltage will be reduced as shown on the left.

OK> Perform confirmation driving pattern.

Replace oxygen sensor.

When not using hand-held tester

1 | Are there any other codes (besides code 21 and 28) being output?

NO

YES> Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-17).

Replace oxygen sensor.
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OX Signal Waveform
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Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

With the engine racing (4,000 rpm) measure waveform be-

tween terminals OXL1, OXR1 and E1 of the engine ECU .

HINT:

S The correct waveform is as shown oscillating between
approx. 0.1V and 0.9 V.

S If the oxygen sensor has deteriorated, the amplitude of
the voltage will be reduced as shown on the left.



